Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 3 County Officers

Cross references. —

For provision that all county officers shall be paid in warrants, see §

18-4-102

.

As to board of directors of county library, see ch. 7 of this title.

As to board of trustees in connection with fairgrounds, airports, parks and pleasure grounds, see §

18-9-102

.

As to crimes and offenses relating to public officers generally, see title 6.

For constitutional provision as to consolidation of offices in state, county and municipalities, see art. 14, § 6, Wyo. Const.

For provision that no person except a qualified elector shall be elected or appointed to any civil or military office in a state, see art. 6, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to when county officers elected at a general election shall enter upon their respective duties, see art. 6, § 17, Wyo. Const.

As to method of selecting officers whose election is not provided for in constitution, see art. 6, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to county director of public assistance and social services, see §

42-2-101

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification of prosecuting attorney in state criminal case on account of relationship with accused, 42 ALR5th 581.